Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-705
Life, sickness, or accident insurance; annuities; minors; competency.

A minor not less than ten years of age, as determined by nearest birthday, shall not be deemed incompetent by reason of such minority to contract for or with respect to insurance or annuities upon his life or against bodily injury or death by accident or disability from sickness, for the benefit of himself or his estate, or for the benefit of the father, mother, husband, wife, brother or sister of such minor; nor shall such minor be deemed incompetent by reason of such minority to surrender such insurance or give a valid discharge on account of any benefit accruing or for money payable under the contract; Provided, such surrender or discharge shall be approved in writing by the parent of such minor or person liable for his support.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 121, p. 462;

R.S.1913, § 3258;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. IX, § 4, p. 643;

C.S.1922, § 7857;

Laws 1925, c. 118, § 1, p. 314;

C.S.1929, § 44-804;

Laws 1933, c. 77, § 1, p. 319;

Laws 1937, c. 102, § 1, p. 358;

Laws 1941, c. 85, § 1, p. 333;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 44-804;

R.S.1943, § 44-705;

Laws 1969, c. 373, § 2, p. 1331.